apertium-spa-ast.spa.dix
  <pardef n="enc/ontrar__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontraríamos</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontraría</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontraríais</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontrarías</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontrarían</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontraría</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontraremos</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontraré</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontraréis</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontrarás</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontrarán</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontrará</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontráremos</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontrare</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontrareis</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontrares</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontraren</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontrare</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontrando</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontrándo</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
      </p>
<par n="S__sabiéndo"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontramos</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontré</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontrasteis</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontraste</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontraron</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontró</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontrad</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontra</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
      <p>
        <l>os</l>
        <r>os<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontrad</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
<par n="S__sabed"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontrá</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
<par n="S__sabé"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontrád</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
<par n="S__sabéd"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uentra</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uéntra</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
      </p>
<par n="S__sábe"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontrar</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontrar</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
      </p>
<par n="S__saber"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontrár</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
      </p>
<par n="S__sabér"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontrábamos</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontraba</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontrabais</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontrabas</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontraban</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontraba</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontráramos</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ontrásemos</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontrara</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ontrase</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontrarais</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ontraseis</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontraras</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ontrases</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontraran</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ontrasen</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontrara</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ontrase</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontradas</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontrada</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontrados</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontrado</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>ontrado</l>
        <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

<e><i>enc</i><par n="enc/ontrar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>reenc</i><par n="enc/ontrar__vblex"/></e>
